Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 8
PRESERVATION OF BALLOTS AND ELECTION RECORDS

1-7-801. Ballots preserved.

The designated election official shall remove the ballots from the ballot box after the time period for election contests has passed and preserve the ballots as election records pursuant to section 1-7-802.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 751, § 9, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1422, § 80, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-7-701 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-7-802. Preservation of election records.

The designated election official shall be responsible for the preservation of any election records for a period of at least twenty-five months after the election or until time has expired for which the record would be needed in any contest proceedings, whichever is later. Unused ballots may be destroyed after the time for a challenge to the election has passed. If a federal candidate was on the ballot, the voted ballots and any other required election materials shall be kept for at least twenty-five months after the election.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 752, § 9, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1422, § 81, effective July 1.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 775, § 53, effective May 20.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2062, § 1, effective August 11.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-7-702 as it existed prior to 1992.